New York, session 2025-2026, A2694.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1183 to read as follows: 3 § 1183. Street takeovers and sideshows. 1. For the purposes of this 4 section, a "street takeover or sideshow" shall include, but not be 5 limited to, any illegal gathering of cars performing reckless driving 6 acts, stunts, or contests of speed. 7 2. Except as provided in section eleven hundred eighty-two-a of this 8 article or section sixteen hundred thirty, sixteen hundred forty, 9 sixteen hundred forty-two or sixteen hundred sixty of this chapter, no 10 street takeover or sideshow shall be held and no person shall engage in, 11 aid or abet in, or spectate any street takeover or sideshow on a high- 12 way. 13 3. A violation of any of the provisions of this section shall consti- 14 tute a misdemeanor and be punishable by imprisonment of not more than 15 six months, a fine of one thousand dollars, or both such fine and impri- 16 sonment. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03050-01-5